en: arrowroot
xx: arrowroot
fr: Arrow-root, Marante, Herbe aux flèches
it: radice di maranta
la: Maranta arundinacea

en: artichoke
ar: خرشوف
az: Əkilən ənginar
bg: артишок
bo: ཁོ་རེ་ཡའི་ཤིང་ཞིག
br: Artichaod
ca: Carxofera, carxofa
co: Artichjoccu
cs: artyčok
da: Artiskok
de: Artischocke, Artichoken
es: alcachofa
eu: Orburu
fa: کنگر فرنگی
fi: Latva-artisokka
fr: artichaut, artichauts
gl: Alcachofa
he: ארטישוק
hr: artičoka
hu: Articsóka
id: Artichoke
io: Artichoko
it: carciofo, carciofi
ja: アーティチョーク
kk: Бөрікгүл
kn: ಆರ್ಟಿಚೋಕ್
ko: 아티초크
ku: Artîşok
la: Cynara scolymus
lt: Tikrasis artišokas
mk: Артичока
nl: artisjok
nn: Artisjokk
nv: Azeeʼ hókániitsoh
pl: karczoch, karczochy, karczocha
pt: alcachofra
ro: Anghinare
ru: артишок
rw: Aritisho
sh: Artičoka
si: ආටිචෝක්
sk: Artičoka
sq: Angjinarja
sr: Артичока
sv: kronärtskocka
tr: Enginar
uk: Артишок іспанський
uz: Artishok
vi: Atisô
zh: 朝鲜蓟

en: Artichoke heart, artichoke bottom
ca: cors de carxofa
de: Artischockenherzen
es: Corazones de alcachofa
fi: artisokansydämet
fr: cœurs d'artichauts, coeurs d'artichauts, Fonds d'artichaut
hr: srce artičoke
it: Cuori di carciofo
nl: artisjokharten

en: Frozen raw artichoke bottom
fr: Fond d'artichaut cru surgelé
it: fondo di carciofo crudo surgelato

en: asparagus, asparagus spears
af: Aspersie
ar: هليون
az: Qulançar, Dərman qulançarı
ba: Себен үләне
be: Спаржа лекавая
bg: аспержа, аспержи
bo: འདམ་མྱུག
bs: Šparoga
ca: Espàrrec
cs: Chřest lékařský
da: Asparges
de: Spargel, Gemüsespargel, Spargelstangen
el: Σπαράγγι
eo: Asparago, asparagi
es: espárrago, espárragos, tallos de espárragos
et: spargel, asparaagus
eu: Себен үләне
fa: مارچوبه
fi: Parsa
fr: asperge, asperges, asperges pic-nic
gl: Esparragueira
gv: Asparag
he: אספרג רפואי
hi: शतावर
hr: ljekovita šparoga
id: Asparagus
io: Asparago
is: Spergill
it: Asparago, aspargi, asparagio
ja: アスパラガス
ka: სატაცური
kk: Кәдімгі қасқыржем
kn: ಶತಾವರಿ
ko: 아스파라거스
ku: Kilig, Közönséges spárga
li: Asperge
lt: Vaistinis smidras, šparagas
lv: Sparģeļi
mr: अस्पॅरॅगस
ms: Asparagus
my: ကညွတ်ပင်
nb: Asparges
ne: कुरिलो
nl: asperge, asperges
nn: Asparges
nv: Chʼałdą́ą́ʼ, Jádí nátʼoh
oc: Espargue
pa: ਛਤਾਵਰ
pl: Szparag, szparagi, szparagów
pt: espargo
qu: Isparaw
ro: Sparanghel
ru: спаржа
rw: Asiperije
sd: اسپريگس
sh: Špargla
sl: Beluš, špargelj
sq: Shpargulli mjekësor
sr: Шпаргла
sv: Sparris
ta: சாத்தாவாரியினம்
te: పిల్లితేగ
tl: Esparago
uk: Холодок лікарський
ur: ہلیون
vi: Măng tây
wa: Aspedje
yi: אספארגוס
zh: 芦笋

en: green asparagus
bg: зелена аспержа, зелени аспержи
de: grüner Spargel, Grüne Spargeln
es: espárragos verdes
fi: vihreä parsa
fr: asperges vertes
hr: zelene šparoge
it: asparagi verdi
nl: groene asperges
pl: zielone szparagi, zielony szparag, zielonych szparagów
pt: espargos verdes

en: violet asparagus
fr: asperge violette
it: asparagi violetti

en: white asparagus
bg: бяла аспержа, бели аспержи
de: weisser Spargel, weißer Spargel, weisse Spargeln
es: Espárrago blanco
fi: valkoinen parsa
fr: asperges blanches, asperge blanche, asperges blanches grosses, asperges blanches des sables des Landes IGP
hr: bijele šparoge
it: asparagi bianchi
nl: witte asperges
pl: białe szparagi, biały szparag, białych szparagów
pt: Espargos brancos

en: asparagus heads
fr: pointes d'asperges moyennes
it: teste di asparagi

en: green asparagus heads
es: espárrago verde, espárrago verde tallos y puntas
fr: pointes d'asperges vertes
it: teste di asparagi verdi

en: white asparagus heads
es: vemas de espárragos blancos
it: teste di asparagi bianchi

en: bitter melon, momordic, balsam pear, bitter gourd
de: Bittermelone
es: melón amargo, momordic
fr: melon amer, margose, momordique
hr: gorka dinja
it: melone amaro, momordic
ja: ゴーヤ, ニガウリ, 苦瓜, にがうり
nl: Sopropo

en: bamboo
ar: خيزران
as: বাঁহ
az: Bambuk
be: бамбуки
bg: Бамбук
bi: Bambu
bn: বাঁশ
bo: སྨུག་མ།
ca: Bambú
co: Bambù
cs: Bambus
cy: Bambŵ
da: Bambus
de: Bambus
el: Μπαμπού
eo: Bambuo
es: Bambú
et: Bambus
eu: Banbu
fa: خیزران
fi: bambu
fj: Veibitubitu
fr: bambou
ga: Bambú
gd: Cuilc Innseannach
gl: Bambú
gn: Takuapi
gu: વાંસ
he: חזרן
hi: बाँस
hr: bambus
ht: Banbou
hu: Bambusz
id: Bambu
io: Bambuo
is: Bambus
it: bambù
ja: 竹
jv: Pring
ka: ბამბუკი
kk: Бамбукkn
ko: 대나무
ky: Бамбук
la: Bambuseae
lt: Bambukai
lv: bambusi
mk: Бамбус
ml: മുള
ms: Buluh
my: ဝါး
nb: bambus
nl: Bamboe
nn: bambus
nv: Lókʼaatsoh
oc: Bambó
pa: ਬਾਂਸ
pl: Bambus
pt: Bambu
ro: Bambus
ru: бамбуки
sa: वंशः
sh: Bambus
sk: Bambus
sl: Bambus
sn: Mushenjere
sq: Bambuja
sr: бамбус
su: Awi
sv: Bambu
sw: Mwanzi
ta: மூங்கில்
te: వెదురు
th: ไผ่
tl: Kawayan
tr: Bambu
uk: бамбук
ur: بانس
vi: tre
za: Faexcuk
zh: 簕竹族

en: bamboo shoot, bamboo sprouts
as: খৰিচা
bo: སྨྱུག་རྩ།
ca: brot de bambú
cs: bambusový výhonek
de: Bambussprossen, Bambusschoessling
el: βλαστάρι μπαμπού, βλαστός μπαμπού
es: brotes de bambú
et: bambusevõrsed, bambusevõrs
eu: banbu-kimuak
fi: bambunverso, bambunversoja
fr: pousse de bambou, pousses de bambou
gn: takuarembo
hr: izdanak bambusa
hu: bambuszrügy
id: rebung
it: germoglio di bambù, germogli di bambù, bambu a fette
ja: タケノコ, 筍, たけのこ
kn: ಕಳಲೆ
ko: 죽순
lt: bambuko ūglis
ms: rebung buluh
nb: bambusskudd
nl: bamboescheuten, bamboescheut, bamboespruit
nn: bambusskudd
or: କରଡ଼ି
pl: pęd bambusa, pędy bambusa
pt: rebento de bambu, rebentos de bambu
ru: бамбуковые побеги
su: iwung
sv: bambuskott
th: หน่อไม้
uk: паростки бамбуку
vi: măng
zh: 筍

en: bamboo fibre
bg: бамбукови фибри
da: bambusfibre
de: Bambusfaser, Bambusfasern
es: Fibra de bambú
fi: bambukuitu
fr: fibre de bambou, fibres de bambou
hr: vlakna bambusa
it: fibra di bambù, fibre di bambù
nl: bamboevezel, bamboevezels
pl: błonnik bambusowy, błonnik roślinny bambusowy
sv: bambufiber

en: bamboo shoot fiber
de: bamboo fibre
fr: fibres de pousses de bambou
hr: vlakna izdanaka bambusa
it: fibra di germoglio di bambù
nl: vezels van bamboescheuten

en: sasa veitchii
xx: sasa veitchii
ja: クマザサ

en: beetroot, beet, beet root
af: Beet
bg: цвекло
ca: remolatxa
da: rødbede, rødbeder
de: Rüben, Randen
es: remolacha, betarraga
fi: punajuuri
fr: betterave, betteraves
he: סלק
hr: cikla, cikle, cikle u boji
hu: cékla
it: barbabietola
ja: ビーツ
lt: burokas, burokėlis, jauni burokėliai
nb: rødbete, rødbeter, rødbet, rødbets
nl: biet, bieten
nn: raudbete, raudbetar, raudbeter
pl: burak, buraki, buraka, buraków, burak ćwikłowy, buraki ćwikłowe, buraka ćwikłowego, buraków ćwikłowych
pt: beterraba
ru: свёкла
sk: cvikly
sv: rödbeta, rödbetor, rödbets

en: red beetroot
bg: червено цвекло
cs: červená řepa
de: Rote Bete, Rote Beete
es: Remolacha roja
fr: betterave rouge, betteraves rouges
hr: crvena cikla
it: barbabietole rosse
ja: 赤ビーツ
lt: raudonieji burokėliai
nl: rode biet
pl: burak czerwony, buraki czerwone, buraków czerwonych, buraka czerwonego, czerwony burak, czerwone buraki, czerwonych buraków, czerwonego buraka
pt: beterraba vermelha

en: cooked red beetroot
fr: betteraves rouges entieres cuites
it: barbabietola rossa cotta